zh-CN: 打印服务器外形: 适配器模块; 外置独立式; 内置卡; USB 加密狗; 其他
bg-BG: Типоразмер на сървъра за отпечатване: Адаптерен модул; Външен самостоятелен; Вътрешна карта; USB донгъл; Други
zh-TW: 列印伺服器外型規格: 轉接模組; 外接獨立式; 內置卡; USB 接收器; 其他
cs: Provedení tiskového serveru: Adaptérový modul; Externí samostatný; Interní karta; USB dongle; Jiné
en: Print server form factor: Adapter module; External standalone; Internal card; USB dongle; Other
hr-HR: Oblik tiskanog poslužitelja: Adapterski modul; Vanjski samostalan; Interna kartica; USB dongle; Ostalo
ko: 프린트 서버 폼 팩터: 어댑터 모듈; 외장 독립형; 내장 카드; USB 동글; 기타
sk-SK: Formát tlačového servera: Adaptérový modul; Externý samostatný; Interná karta; USB adaptér; Iné
hu: Nyomtatószerver-formátum: Adapter modul; Külső önálló; Belső kártya; USB dongle; Egyéb
ja: プリントサーバーのフォームファクター: アダプターモジュール; 外部スタンドアロン; 内蔵カード; USBドングル; その他
nb: Utskriftsserver formfaktor: Adaptermodul; Ekstern frittstående; Internt kort; USB-dongle; Annet
fr: Facteur de forme du serveur d’impression: Module adaptateur; Externe autonome; Carte interne; Dongle USB; Autre
pt-PT: Formato do servidor de impressão: Módulo adaptador; Externo autónomo; Placa interna; Dongle USB; Outro
de: Druckserver-Formfaktor: Adaptermodul; Externes eigenständiges Gerät; Interne Karte; USB-Dongle; Sonstiges
tr: Yazdırma sunucusu form faktörü: Adaptör modülü; Harici bağımsız; Dahili kart; USB dongle; Diğer
es: Factor de forma del servidor de impresión: Módulo adaptador; Externo independiente; Tarjeta interna; Adaptador USB; Otros
pt-BR: Fator de formato do servidor de impressão: Módulo adaptador; Externo independente; Placa interna; Dongle USB; Outro
th: รูปแบบของพรินต์เซิร์ฟเวอร์: โมดูลอะแดปเตอร์; ภายนอกแยกเดี่ยว; การ์ดภายใน; ดองเกิล USB; อื่นๆ
sv: Skrivarservers formfaktor: Adaptermodul; Extern fristående; Internt kort; USB-dongel; Övrigt
lt-LT: Spausdinimo serverio formos faktorius: Adapterio modulis; Išorinis atskiras; Vidinė plokštė; USB adapteris; Kita
da: Printserver-formfaktor: Adaptermodul; Ekstern selvstændig; Internt kort; USB-dongle; Andet
it: Fattore di forma del server di stampa: Modulo adattatore; Esterno autonomo; Scheda interna; Dongle USB; Altro
sl-SI: Oblika tiskalnega strežnika: Adapterski modul; Zunanji samostojni; Notranja kartica; Ključek USB; Drugo
pl: Format serwera wydruku: Moduł adaptera; Zewnętrzny samodzielny; Karta wewnętrzna; Adapter USB; Inne
el: Μορφή διακομιστή εκτύπωσης: Μονάδα προσαρμογέα; Εξωτερικό αυτόνομο; Εσωτερική κάρτα; USB dongle; Άλλο
vi: Kiểu dáng máy chủ in: Mô-đun bộ chuyển đổi; Độc lập bên ngoài; Thẻ nội bộ; USB dongle; Khác
ru: Формфактор сервера печати: Модуль адаптера; Внешний автономный; Внутренняя карта; USB-адаптер; Другой
fi: Tulostuspalvelimen muototekijä: Sovitinmoduuli; Ulkoinen itsenäinen; Sisäinen kortti; USB-sovitin; Muu
nl: Printserver vormfactor: Adaptermodule; Externe standalone; Interne kaart; USB-dongle; Andere
ro-RO: Factor de formă server de imprimare: Modul adaptor; Extern independent; Card intern; Dongle USB; Altele